District of Columbia statutes.
42-1310

Failure to comply.

A transfer subject to this chapter shall not be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with any provisions of this chapter.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-263, § 11, 46 DCR 2111
1981 Ed., § 45-960.